Tennessee, session 114, HB1679.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1505, is amended by deleting
subsection (c) and substituting:
(c) For a violation of this section, the general sessions or juvenile court may:
(1) Require completion of community service work not to exceed fifty (50)
hours;
(2) Require successful completion of a prescribed court program;
(3) Impose a civil penalty of not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more
than fifty dollars ($50.00), which may be charged against a person who is at least
eighteen (18) years of age but less than twenty-one (21) years of age, or, in the
case of a minor, against a parent, guardian, or custodian; or
(4)
(A) Place the youth on an informal adjustment for a period of
ninety (90) days; or
(B) For a second or subsequent violation, place the youth on
probation for up to six (6) months in addition to requiring community
service and the successful completion of a prescribed court program
focusing on the dangers of tobacco and vapor products.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1679
011296
- 1 -